District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.17

Confidentiality.

The CPO shall review information which has been designated as confidential or proprietary by a person and which has been submitted in response to an Invitation for Bids or Request for Proposals. If the CPO determines that the designation is proper, the information shall be treated by the CPO, and any other District employee, in a confidential manner, shall be disclosed only to District employees for use in the procurement process, and shall not be disclosed to other persons or parties without the prior written consent of the person, except as provided by subchapter II of Chapter 5 of this title [§ 2-531 et seq.].

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 417, 58 DCR 1185